North Carolina, session 2025, HB1122.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.1C reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.1C. Disabled veteran property tax homestead exclusion.
(a) Classification. – A permanent residence owned and occupied by a qualifying owner
is designated a special class of property under Article V, Section 2(2) of the North Carolina
Constitution and is taxable in accordance with this section. The first forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000) of appraised value of the residence is excluded from taxation. A qualifying owner who
receives an exclusion under this section may not receive other property tax relief.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Disabled veteran. – A veteran of any branch of the Armed Forces of the United
States whose character of service at separation was honorable or under
honorable conditions and who satisfies one of the following requirements:
a. As of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the exclusion
allowed by this section is claimed, the veteran had received benefits
under 38 U.S.C. § 2101.
b. The veteran has received a certification by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or another federal agency indicating
that, as of January 1 preceding the taxable year for which the exclusion
allowed by this section is claimed, he or she has a service-connected,
permanent, and total disability.
c. The veteran is deceased and the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or another federal agency has certified that, as of January 1
preceding the taxable year for which the exclusion allowed by this
section is claimed, the veteran's death was the result of a
service-connected condition.
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-445, s. 22(c), effective for taxes imposed for
taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2009.
(2a) Hold harmless amount. – The appraised value of a property excluded from
taxation under subsection (a) of this section multiplied by the applicable local
tax rate.
*H1122-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Permanent residence. – Defined in G.S. 105-277.1.
(4) Property tax relief. – Defined in G.S. 105-277.1.
(4a) Qualifying owner. – An owner, as defined in G.S. 105-277.1, who is a North
Carolina resident and one of the following:
a. A disabled veteran.
b. The surviving spouse of a disabled veteran who has not remarried.
(5), (6) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-445, s. 22(c), effective for taxes imposed for
taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2009.
(7) Service-connected. – Defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101.
(8) Total hold harmless amount. – The sum of the following:
a. The hold harmless amount for all property excluded from taxation
under subsection (a) of this section in the county.
b. The hold harmless amount for all property excluded from taxation
under subsection (a) of this section in the cities located in the county.
…
(g) Reimbursement. – On or before September 1 of each year, each county tax collector
shall notify the Secretary of Revenue, in a manner prescribed by the Secretary, of the county's
total hold harmless amount. A county that fails to notify the Secretary of Revenue of its total hold
harmless amount by the due date is barred from receiving a reimbursement under this subsection
for that taxable year. On or before December 31 of each year, the Secretary of Revenue shall
distribute to each county its respective total hold harmless amount.
Any funds received by a county that are attributable to a city within the county must be
distributed to that respective city. Any funds received by a county or city because the county or
city was collecting taxes for another unit of government or special district must be credited to the
funds of that other unit or district in accordance with regulations issued by the Local Government
Commission.
In order to pay for the reimbursement under this section and the cost to the Department of
Revenue of administering the reimbursement, the Secretary of Revenue shall draw from
collections received under Part 2 of Article 4 of this Chapter an amount equal to the
reimbursement and the cost of administration."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Revenue the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for administrative expenses associated with implementing the hold
harmless provision implemented by this act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years
beginning on or after July 1, 2027. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1122-First Edition